src-fst-affixes-acronyms.lexc.md
# Acronym inflection
Acronyms are inflected using a colon, followed by the inflectional endings,
which depend on either last letter of the word or inflection class of the
last word of the abbreviation. The exception to the inflection scheme is the
singular nominative, which appears without colon.
Pronouncable abbreviations such as aids, hiv, kela, alko etc. are actually
counted as regular words with regular inflection patterns.
c.f. [VISK § 169](http://scripta.kotus.fi/visk/sisallys.php?p=169)


## Acronyms ending in numbers inflect like the numbers are pronounced.










































































































































































































































































































































* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/acronyms.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-fin/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/acronyms.lexc)</small>
